Utah statutes.
76-6-524.   Falsifying information for preconstruction lien purposes.

A person who knowingly falsifies information for the purpose of obtaining priority of a preconstruction lien under Title 38, Chapter 1a, Preconstruction and Construction Liens, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 278, 2012 General Session

